Arkansas, session 2025, HB1779.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-36-103(b)(2) and (3), concerning the
types of theft of property that constitute a Class C felony and a Class D
felony, are amended to read as follows:
(2) Class C felony if:
(A) The value of the property is less than twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000) but more than five thousand dollars ($5,000);
(B) The property is obtained by threat;
(C) The property is a firearm valued at two thousand five
hundred dollars ($2,500) or more;
(D) The property is building material obtained from a
permitted construction site and the value of the building material is five
*CEB119*
04-08-2025 10:25:39 CEB119

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 HB1779
hundred dollars ($500) or more;
(E) The value of the property is five hundred dollars
($500) or more and the theft occurred in an area declared to be under a state
of emergency pursuant to proclamation by the President of the United States,
the Governor, or the executive officer of a city or county; or
(F) The property is oil and gas equipment, the value of
the property is five thousand dollars ($5,000) or less but more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000), and the person:
(i) Caused more than two hundred fifty dollars
($250) in incidental damage to the owner of the oil and gas equipment during
the commission of the offense; or
(ii) Transported the oil and gas equipment across
state lines to sell or dispose of the oil and gas equipment; or
(G) The property is a postal package removed from the
curtilage of a residential occupiable structure or from a delivery vehicle at
any point throughout the delivery route;
(3) Class D felony if:
(A) The value of the property is five thousand dollars
($5,000) or less but more than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(B) The property is a firearm valued at less than two
thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500);
(C) The property is a:
(i) Credit card or credit card account number; or
(ii) Debit card or debit card account number;
(D) The value of the property is at least one hundred
dollars ($100) or more but less than five hundred dollars ($500) and the
theft occurred in an area declared to be under a state of emergency pursuant
to proclamation by the President of the United States, the Governor, or the
executive officer of a city or county;
(E) The property is livestock and the value of the
livestock is in excess of two hundred dollars ($200);
(F) The property is an electric power line, gas line,
water line, wire or fiber insulator, electric motor, or other similar
apparatus connected to a farm shop, on-farm grain drying and storage complex,
heating and cooling system, environmental control system, animal production
facility, irrigation system, or dwelling;
04-08-2025 10:25:39 CEB119

As Engrossed: S4/8/25 HB1779
(G) The property is a decorative or memorial item from a
cemetery, graveyard, or a person's grave site and the offense is the actor's
second or subsequent offense of theft of a decorative or memorial item from a
cemetery, graveyard, or a person's grave site under this section;
(H) The property is oil and gas equipment and the value of
the oil and gas equipment is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or less, and the
person:
(i) Caused more than two hundred fifty dollars
($250) in incidental damage to the owner of the oil and gas equipment during
the commission of the offense; or
(ii) Transported the oil and gas equipment across
state lines to sell or dispose of the oil and gas equipment;
(I) The property is a postal package removed from the
curtilage of a residential occupiable structure or from a delivery vehicle at
any point throughout the delivery route; or
(J)(I) The value of the property is one thousand dollars
($1,000) or less and the person has been previously convicted of a theft
offense of any classification within ten (10) years of the current offense;
or

/s/Gazaway















04-08-2025 10:25:39 CEB119